New York, session 2025-2026, S1363.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0123 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0123. Prohibition of nonemergency application of pesticide or lawn 4 care pesticide. 5 1. No person, firm, partnership, association, limited liability compa- 6 ny, corporation, municipality or government entity shall allow or imple- 7 ment the nonemergency application of pesticide or lawn care pesticide in 8 any municipal park lands and lands under the jurisdiction of the state 9 office of parks, recreation and historic preservation. 10 2. Prior to any application of pesticide or lawn care pesticide, the 11 office shall provide public notice at least seventy-two hours prior to 12 such application. Such public notice shall remain posted on the premise 13 and on any internet web site operated by the office for seventy-two 14 hours. 15 3. For the purposes of this section: 16 (a) "pesticide" means a fungicide used on plants, an insecticide, a 17 herbicide or a rodenticide, but does not mean a sanitizer, disinfectant, 18 antimicrobial agent or pesticide bait in a tamper resistant container; 19 (b) "lawn care pesticide" means a pesticide registered by the United 20 States Environmental Protection Agency and labeled pursuant to the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03137-01-5 S. 1363 2 1 federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act for use in lawn, 2 garden and ornamental sites or areas, but shall not include any: 3 (1) microbial pesticide or biochemical pesticide that is registered 4 with the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or 5 (2) a pesticide classified by the United States Environmental 6 Protection Agency as an exempt material under 40 CFR 152.25; 7 (c) "microbial pesticide" means a pesticide that consists of a 8 microorganism as the active ingredient; and 9 (d) "biochemical pesticide" means a naturally occurring substance that 10 controls pests by nontoxic mechanisms. 11 4. The department is authorized to promulgate such rules and regu- 12 lations as it shall deem necessary to implement the provisions of this 13 section. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.